Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1631.01
Local boards of health; rules and regulations; violations; penalty.

Any person violating any rule or regulation, authorized by the provisions of either subdivision (7) or (9) of section 71-1631, shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor, and each day's violation shall be considered a separate offense.

Laws 1955, c. 275, § 2, p. 872;

Laws 1969, c. 151, § 7, p. 717;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 161.